Utah statutes.
26-33a-109.   Exceptions to prohibition on disclosure of identifiable health
data.
(1)  The committee may not disclose any identifiable health data unless:
(a)  the individual has authorized the disclosure; or
(b)  the disclosure complies with the provisions of this section.
(2)  The committee shall consider the following when responding to a request
for disclosure of information that may include identifiable health data:
(a)  whether the request comes from a person after that person has received
approval to do the specific research and statistical work from an
institutional review board; and
(b)  whether the requesting entity complies with the provisions of Subsection
(3).
(3)  A request for disclosure of information that may include identifiable
health data shall:
(a)  be for a specified period; or
(b)  be solely for bona fide research and statistical purposes as determined
in accordance with administrative rules adopted by the department, which shall
require:
(i)  the requesting entity to demonstrate to the department that the data is
required for the research and statistical purposes proposed by the requesting
entity; and
(ii)  the requesting entity to enter into a written agreement satisfactory to
the department to protect the data in accordance with this chapter or other
applicable law.
(4)  A person accessing identifiable health data pursuant to Subsection (3)
may not further disclose the identifiable health data:
(a)  without prior approval of the department; and
(b)  unless the identifiable health data is disclosed or identified by control
number only.
